California, session 20252026, SB267.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17055.2 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17055.2. (a) For each taxable year taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount equal to the unreimbursed amount paid or incurred by a qualified teacher during the taxable year for instructional materials and classroom supplies, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) (A) “Instructional materials and classroom supplies” means books, supplies, computer equipment, including related software, services, and other equipment, and supplementary materials used in the classroom, that are not of a religious nature.(B) “Instructional materials and classroom supplies” does not include nonathletic supplies for courses of instruction in health or physical education.(2) “Qualified teacher” means a teacher in a public, charter, or private school offering instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive. inclusive, for at least 900 hours during a school year.(c) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding two years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.(d) (1) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares that the goals of this credit are both of the following:(A) To provide relief to teachers until more permanent funding can be provided to furnish classrooms with the needed supplies to make the credit obsolete.(B) To provide a baseline to determine if education funding is reducing the need for qualified teachers to purchase instructional materials and classroom supplies.(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board, no later than December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing on the number of taxpayers allowed a credit pursuant to this section, and the total dollar amount of credits allowed.(B) The disclosure requirements of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.